South Dakota, session 2026, HB1113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 11-15-6 be AMENDED:
11-15-6. The authority shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26,
specifying the criteria and process for the application, approval, and disbursement of:
(1) Loans and grants provided in accordance with §§ 11-15-1 to 11-15-5, inclusive,
and § 11-15-7; and
(2) Loans provided in accordance with § 11-15-8; and
(3) Loans provided in accordance with section 2 of this Act.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 11-15:
The authority shall administer a manufactured housing downpayment assistance
program, as a revolving loan fund, to assist eligible applicants with purchasing
manufactured housing. Up to five million dollars from the South Dakota housing
infrastructure fund may be loaned, on a revolving basis, for the purpose of this section.
The authority may provide a loan for downpayment assistance, not exceeding ten
thousand dollars, to each eligible applicant. An applicant is eligible for a loan under this
section if:
(1) The applicant has a household income not exceeding one hundred twenty percent
of the state area median income; and
(2) The applicant uses the loan to make a downpayment on the purchase of a
manufactured home, as defined in § 34-34A-1.1, which:
(a) Is located in this state;
(b) Complies with all applicable provisions of the Manufactured Home
Construction and Safety Standards, 24 C.F.R. Part 3280 (January 1, 2026);
and
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.672.18 2 1113
(c) Complies with all applicable zoning requirements for a single-family
residence, as provided in state and local law.
Any loan provided under this section must be secured by a second lien on the
home, at an interest rate of zero percent, which is due upon the sale of the home or
satisfaction of the first lien securing the home.
All moneys received by the authority in repayment of a loan issued pursuant to this
section must be deposited in the South Dakota housing infrastructure fund and used for
making new loans pursuant to this section.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.